espeak/dictsource/azo_rules
// ====================================================================
// Awing (azo) Pronunciation Rules for eSpeak-NG
// Maps Awing orthography to phonemes
// Reference: Alomofor & Anderson, "Awing Orthography Guide" (2005)
//            Alomofor, "Awing-English Dictionary" (2007)
//
// Tone marking in Awing orthography:
//   á (acute) = High/Mid tone (non-low) → tone phoneme 1
//   a (unmarked) = Low tone → tone phoneme 3
//   â (circumflex) = Falling tone → tone phoneme 5
//   ǎ (caron/háček) = Rising tone → tone phoneme 4
//
// Note: High and Mid share the same diacritic (á).
// We map á → High tone (1) by default.
// Context-sensitive mid tone can be refined later.
// ====================================================================

// ====================================================================
// .replace — Normalize Unicode combining characters
// Converts composed/decomposed forms to consistent representations
// ====================================================================
.replace
// Normalize common Unicode variations
  ŋ	ŋ
  ɛ	ɛ
  ɔ	ɔ
  ə	ə
  ɨ	ɨ


// ====================================================================
// Letter groups for use in rules
// ====================================================================
// L01 = all Awing vowel letters (for matching)
.L01 a e ɛ ə i ɨ o ɔ u á é ɛ́ ə́ í ɨ́ ó ɔ́ ú à è ɛ̀ ə̀ ì ɨ̀ ò ɔ̀ ù â ê ɛ̂ ə̂ î ɨ̂ ô ɔ̂ û ǎ ě ɛ̌ ə̌ ǐ ɨ̌ ǒ ɔ̌ ǔ

// L02 = consonant letters
.L02 b d f g k l m n p s t w y z

// L03 = nasal consonants (for prenasalized cluster detection)
.L03 m n ŋ

// L04 = high vowels (for /t/ aspiration rule)
.L04 i ɨ u í ɨ́ ú


// ====================================================================
// CONSONANT GROUPS
// Multi-character graphemes must come before single-character ones
// eSpeak processes rules in order; first match wins
// ====================================================================

// --- Prenasalized consonants ---
// These are syllabic nasal + consonant clusters
// The nasal is homorganic (same place as following consonant)

.group mb
       mb     mb         // /mb/ prenasalized bilabial

.group nt
       nt     nt         // /nt/ prenasalized alveolar

.group nd
       nd     nd         // /nd/ prenasalized alveolar voiced

.group nk
       nk     Nk         // /ŋk/ prenasalized velar (nasal assimilates)

.group ng
       ng     Ng         // /ŋg/ prenasalized velar (nasal assimilates)
       // Note: "ng" is always prenasalized, never /n/+/g/ separately

.group mm
       mm     mm         // /mm/ geminate/prenasalized bilabial nasal

.group nn
       nn     nn         // /nn/ geminate/prenasalized alveolar nasal

.group nj
       nj     n^Z        // /ɲdʒ/ prenasalized palatal (nasal + voiced affricate)

.group nch
       nch    n^tS       // /ɲtʃ/ prenasalized palatal (nasal + voiceless affricate)

.group nts
       nts    nts        // /nts/ prenasalized alveolar affricate

.group ndz
       ndz    ndz        // /ndz/ prenasalized alveolar voiced affricate

.group nny
       nny    n^n^       // /ɲɲ/ prenasalized palatal nasal


// --- Palatalized consonants ---
// Second element is palatal glide [j], written "y"

.group ty
       ty     tj         // /tj/ palatalized alveolar

.group ky
       ky     kj         // /kj/ palatalized velar

.group py
       py     pj         // /pj/ palatalized bilabial

.group by
       by     bj         // /bj/ palatalized bilabial voiced

.group gy
       gy     gj         // /gj/ palatalized velar voiced

.group fy
       fy     fj         // /fj/ palatalized labiodental

.group ly
       ly     lj         // /lj/ palatalized lateral

.group my
       my     mj         // /mj/ palatalized bilabial nasal


// --- Labialized consonants ---
// Second element is labiovelar glide [w], written "w"

.group tw
       tw     tw         // /tw/ labialized alveolar

.group kw
       kw     kw         // /kw/ labialized velar

.group pw
       pw     pw         // /pw/ labialized bilabial

.group bw
       bw     bw         // /bw/ labialized bilabial voiced

.group dw
       dw     dw         // /dw/ labialized alveolar voiced

.group gw
       gw     gw         // /gw/ labialized velar voiced

.group fw
       fw     fw         // /fw/ labialized labiodental

.group lw
       lw     lw         // /lw/ labialized lateral

.group nw
       nw     nw         // /nw/ labialized alveolar nasal

.group shw
       shw    Sw         // /ʃw/ labialized postalveolar

.group chw
       chw    tSw        // /tʃw/ labialized postalveolar affricate

.group jw
       jw     Zw         // /ʒw/ labialized postalveolar voiced


// --- Digraph consonants (non-cluster) ---

.group gh
       gh     Q          // /ɣ/ voiced velar fricative

.group sh
       sh     S          // /ʃ/ voiceless postalveolar fricative

.group ch
       ch     tS         // /tʃ/ voiceless postalveolar affricate

.group ts
       ts     ts         // /ts/ voiceless alveolar affricate

.group ny
       ny     n^         // /ɲ/ palatal nasal


// --- Single consonants ---

.group b
       b      b          // /b/

.group d
       d      d          // /d/

.group f
       f      f          // /f/

.group g
       g      g          // /g/ (only after nasals word-initially)

.group j
       j      Z          // /ʒ/

.group k
       k      k          // /k/

.group l
       l      l          // /l/

.group m
       m      m          // /m/

.group n
       n      n          // /n/

.group p
       p      p          // /p/

.group s
       s      s          // /s/

.group t
       t      t          // /t/

.group w
       w      w          // /w/

.group y
       y      j          // /j/ palatal approximant

.group z
       z      z          // /z/


// --- Special characters ---

.group ŋ
       ŋ      N          // /ŋ/ velar nasal (also written as part of "ng")

.group '
       '      ?          // /ʔ/ glottal stop


// ====================================================================
// VOWEL GROUPS
// Each vowel has forms with tone diacritics:
//   acute (á) = High tone (1)
//   unmarked  = Low tone (3)
//   circumflex (â) = Falling tone (5)
//   caron (ǎ) = Rising tone (4)
//
// Long vowels are written as doubled: aa, ee, ɛɛ, əə, oo
// ====================================================================

// --- /a/ ---
.group a
       aa     a:3        // long low
       aá     a:1        // long high
       áa     a:1        // long high (tone on first)
       áá     a:1        // long high
       a      a3         // short low (default)
       á      a1         // short high
       â      a5         // short falling
       ǎ      a4         // short rising

// --- /e/ ---
.group e
       ee     e:3        // long low
       eé     e:1        // long high
       ée     e:1        // long high (tone on first)
       éé     e:1        // long high
       e      e3         // short low
       é      e1         // short high
       ê      e5         // short falling
       ě      e4         // short rising

// --- /ɛ/ (open-mid front) ---
.group ɛ
       ɛɛ     E:3        // long low
       ɛɛ́     E:1        // long high
       ɛ́ɛ     E:1        // long high
       ɛ́ɛ́     E:1        // long high
       ɛ      E3         // short low
       ɛ́      E1         // short high
       ɛ̂      E5         // short falling
       ɛ̌      E4         // short rising

// --- /ə/ (schwa) ---
.group ə
       əə     @:3        // long low
       əə́     @:1        // long high
       ə́ə     @:1        // long high
       ə́ə́     @:1        // long high
       ə      @3         // short low
       ə́      @1         // short high
       ə̂      @5         // short falling
       ə̌      @4         // short rising

// --- /i/ ---
.group i
    // Diphthong iə
       ié     i@3        // diphthong iə low
       iə́     i@1        // diphthong iə high
       iə     i@3        // diphthong iə low
       i      i3         // short low
       í      i1         // short high
       î      i5         // short falling
       ǐ      i4         // short rising

// --- /ɨ/ (barred-i, close central) ---
.group ɨ
    // Diphthong ɨə
       ɨə     i"@3       // diphthong ɨə low
       ɨ      i"3        // short low
       ɨ́      i"1        // short high
       ɨ̂      i"5        // short falling
       ɨ̌      i"4        // short rising

// --- /o/ ---
.group o
       oo     o:3        // long low
       oó     o:1        // long high
       óo     o:1        // long high
       óó     o:1        // long high
       o      o3         // short low
       ó      o1         // short high
       ô      o5         // short falling
       ǒ      o4         // short rising

// --- /ɔ/ (open-mid back rounded) ---
.group ɔ
       ɔ      O3         // short low
       ɔ́      O1         // short high
       ɔ̂      O5         // short falling
       ɔ̌      O4         // short rising

// --- /u/ ---
.group u
    // Diphthong uə
       uə     u@3        // diphthong uə low
       uə́     u@1        // diphthong uə high
       u      u3         // short low
       ú      u1         // short high
       û      u5         // short falling
       ǔ      u4         // short rising


// ====================================================================
// SYLLABIC NASAL PREFIX
// Ń- (high tone nasal prefix on verbs): always high tone
// ḿ (before b/p), ń (before d/t/s/z/l/n), ɲ́ (before ch/j), ŋ́ (before k/g)
// ====================================================================

.group ḿ
       ḿ      m1         // syllabic nasal high tone (bilabial)

.group ń
       ń      n-1        // syllabic nasal high tone (alveolar)

.group ŋ́
       ŋ́      N1         // syllabic nasal high tone (velar)


// ====================================================================
// PUNCTUATION AND SPACING
// ====================================================================

.group _
       _      _          // word boundary / pause
